Tennessee, session 114, HB2620.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-17-105, is amended by deleting
subsection (c) and substituting:
(c) One (1) copy of each audit must be furnished to each member of the council
and one (1) copy must be furnished to the comptroller of the treasury. The comptroller
of the treasury shall publish the audit on the comptroller of the treasury's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2620
012714
- 1 -